Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1
STATE, COUNTY, AND CITY HIGHWAY SYSTEMS

43-2-101. State highway system.

There shall be established in this state a system of roads known as "the state highway system". The state highway system shall consist of the federal-aid primary roads, the federal-aid secondary roads, and the interstate system, including extensions thereof within urban areas, plus an amount not to exceed five percent of the mileage of such systems which may be declared to be state highways by the transportation commission while not being any part of any federal system.

"Interstate system" as used in this section means any highway included as a part of the national system of interstate and defense highways as authorized and designated in accordance with section 7 of the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1944" (58 Stat. 838) and any other subsequent acts of congress.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting the mileage of the state highway system to the total mileage constituting the system as of December 31, 1953, but federal-aid primary roads and federal-aid secondary roads may be added or deleted by the department of transportation according to need as determined by said department. Deletions from the federal-aid secondary system shall be mutually decided by the federal government, the state, and the affected county.

In addition to the powers now possessed by the transportation commission, it has the authority to select or designate any public highway, road, or street as a part of the federal-aid urban system or as an extension of the federal-aid primary or secondary system, in order to qualify such public highways, roads, or streets for the expenditure by the state of federal-aid funds to be apportioned to the state pursuant to the provisions of 23 U.S.C. sec. 135, as amended, and section 106 of the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1970", and regulations promulgated thereunder. Any provision of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, any public highway, road, or street selected or designated under this subsection (4) shall continue to be a part of the county highway or city street systems and shall not be deemed to be a part of the state highway system unless the commission specifically provides to the contrary.

Any receipt of moneys from the federal government, or any department thereof, pursuant to the provisions of 23 U.S.C. sec. 135, as amended, and section 106 of the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1970" shall be paid into and credited to the state highway supplementary fund.

The construction of all improvements authorized pursuant to the provisions of 23 U.S.C. sec. 135, as amended, and section 106 of the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1970", and moneys received therefor, are under the supervision and control of the chief engineer.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 512, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-1.

L. 57:

p. 641, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-1.

L. 70:

p. 329, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1140, § 1.

L. 91:

(1), (3), (4)(a), and (4)(c) amended, p. 1098, § 127, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(4)(c) amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 176, § 8, effective March 30.

Cross references:

For the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1970", see Pub.L. 91-605, codified at 23 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.

43-2-101.5. Devolution of commuter highways to counties and municipalities - required study - definitions.

The transportation commission, using existing or easily obtainable data, shall conduct or direct the department of transportation to conduct a study of the state highway system for the purpose of determining which highways or portions of highways that are part of the state highway system are commuter highways. The commission shall report the results of the study to the transportation and energy committee of the house of representatives and the transportation committee of the senate, or any successor committees, no later than February 1, 2011. The commission may include in the report recommendations as to whether all or some of the identified commuter highways should be removed from the state highway system and thereafter maintained and supervised by counties and municipalities. If the commission recommends the removal of any commuter highways from the state highway system, it shall first have consulted with the affected metropolitan planning organizations in the conduct of the study, received the input of one local government elected official appointed by each of the five metropolitan planning organizations in the state for the purpose of providing such input, and presented the recommendations to the boards of the affected metropolitan planning organizations for review and comment and shall also make recommendations regarding modification of the formulas used to allocate moneys in the highway users tax fund between the state, counties, and municipalities set forth in part 2 of article 4 of this title to provide the level of funding necessary to avoid any unfunded mandates created by changes in the allocation of highway maintenance and supervision responsibilities between the state, counties, and municipalities that would result from the removal. A report made pursuant to this section that includes recommendations as to whether commuter highways should be removed from the state highway system shall include a statement regarding the extent to which the elected officials appointed by the metropolitan planning organizations in the state agree with the commission's recommendations.

For purposes of this section:

"Commuter highway" means a highway or a portion of a highway that:

Is part of the state highway system;

Is located within the territory of a metropolitan planning organization;

Is not an interstate highway; and

Is determined in the conduct of the study required by subsection (1) of this section to be used at least eighty percent of the time, estimated as a percentage of total trips on the highway or portion of a highway, for travel within the territory of the metropolitan planning organization.

"Metropolitan planning organization" means a metropolitan planning organization under the "Federal Transit Act of 1998", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5301 et seq., as amended.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1405), ch. 368, p. 1733, § 1, effective June 7.

43-2-102. Department maintain system.

The department of transportation shall construct and maintain all roads comprising the state highway system as provided by this part 1.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 512, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-2.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1098, § 128, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 291, § 46, effective August 8.

43-2-103. Urban highway contracts.

In all cases where any part of the state highway system extends into or through a city or incorporated town, the construction and maintenance of such systems shall remain the obligation of the department of transportation. Nothing in this part 1, however, shall be construed as denying the department of transportation the right to enter into a contract with a city or incorporated town for the maintenance or construction of such urban connections, where it appears that such city or incorporated town has adequate facilities.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 513, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1099, § 129, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For similar provisions, see § 43-1-217 (2).

43-2-104. County highway contracts.

The department of transportation may also contract with the counties wherein any roads comprising a part of the state highway system are situated for the maintenance or construction of such roads directly by the county.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 513, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-4.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1099, § 130, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For similar provisions, see § 43-1-217 (2).

43-2-104.5. Reimbursement of counties and municipalities.

The department of transportation is authorized to reimburse, pursuant to contract, counties, cities, or incorporated towns for maintenance or construction of highways which are part of the state highway system. Such reimbursement may be over a period of time, and any funds available to the department of transportation for the maintenance and construction of public highways may be used.

Any municipality, county, or political subdivision may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the department of transportation to loan to the department of transportation funds necessary to accelerate the completion of state highway projects. Such loaned funds may be repaid by the department of transportation from any funds available to that department for the maintenance and construction of public highways. Such acceleration of projects must be approved by the transportation commission and the governing board of the municipality, county, or political subdivision involved. The construction of projects conducted pursuant to this section shall be carried out under the supervision of the chief engineer of the department of transportation, who may contract with private parties for construction services. Any municipality, county, or political subdivision may contract with private parties for construction services when conducting projects pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire section added, p. 63, § 19, effective August 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1099, § 131, effective July 1.

43-2-105. Secondary road unit. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 53:

p. 513, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-5.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1099, § 132, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 45, effective August 4.

43-2-106. Abandoned state highways.

When a portion of a state highway is relocated and, because of the relocation, a portion of the route as it existed before the relocation is, in the opinion of the transportation commission, no longer necessary as a state highway, the portion shall be considered as abandoned. The transportation commission may also determine that all or a portion of a state highway no longer functions as a part of the state highway system, and, with the agreement of each affected county or municipality, the state highway or portion thereof shall be considered as abandoned. An abandoned state highway or portion thereof shall become a county highway, upon the adoption of a resolution to that effect by the board of county commissioners of an affected county, or a city street, upon the adoption of an ordinance to that effect by the governing body of any affected municipality, within ninety days after the official notification of abandonment by the transportation commission. If the county or municipality ceases to use the abandoned portion of the highway for the purpose of a county highway or a city street, title to the abandoned state highway or portion thereof shall revert to the department of transportation.

When the department of transportation makes a payment to a county or municipality as compensation for the transfer of ownership to the county or municipality of all or a portion of a state highway abandoned pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) as a result of the granting of an application for such a transfer of ownership filed on or after August 5, 2009, the county or municipality shall credit the payment to a special fund to be used only for transportation-related expenditures.

For purposes of this subsection (1), all or a portion of a state highway shall be considered to function as part of the state highway system, and shall not be determined by the transportation commission to no longer function as a part of the state highway system, unless the commission and each county or municipality that would be affected by the abandonment of the state highway or portion of a state highway agree that the state highway or portion of a state highway no longer serves the ongoing purposes of the state highway system.

If, pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the abandoned portion of a state highway is not claimed by a county, city, or town or if title to such abandoned portion reverts to the department of transportation, the department of transportation shall dispose of the abandoned portion by means of a sale or exchange for not less than fair market value in the manner set forth in section 43-1-210 (5).

If the department of transportation is not able to dispose of the abandoned portion of a state highway by means of a sale or exchange following a diligent effort for a five-year period, the department shall vacate the abandoned portion and title to such portion shall vest in accordance with the provisions of part 3 of this article.

If it appears to the transportation commission that any landowner suffers damages because of the abandonment of any portion of a state highway, such damages shall be determined, tendered, and paid out of funds allocated to the department of transportation in the same manner as other damages as provided by law.

As used in this section, "exchange" has the same meaning as set forth in section 43-1-210 (5)(d).

Source:

L. 53:

p. 513, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1100, § 133, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1455, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-078), ch. 178, p. 786, § 1, effective August 5.

43-2-107. Standards of construction.

After December 31, 1953, any roads which are constructed so as to become a part of the state highway system, as defined in this part 1, or any road not on said date a part of the state highway system which may be added thereto shall be constructed or improved in accordance with standards for highway construction as adopted and approved by the commission.

Any roads, streets, or highways constructed after July 1, 1975, by the state or any of its political subdivisions shall provide adequate and reasonable access for the safe and convenient movement of persons with disabilities, including those in wheelchairs, across all newly constructed or replaced curbs at all pedestrian crosswalks; except that this subsection (2) shall not be applicable to any contracts executed or let for bid on or before July 1, 1975.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 514, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-7.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1571, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1677, § 100, effective July 1.

43-2-108. County highway systems.

There shall be established in each county a primary system and a secondary system of county roads.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 514, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-8.

43-2-109. County primary systems.

The board of county commissioners of each county shall select the county primary system of roads on the basis of greatest general importance, and the system as selected shall constitute an integrated system within itself or with the state highway system as defined in this part 1.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 514, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-9.

43-2-110. Selection by county - notice - secondary system.

The initial selection of the county road system shall be done in the following manner:

The board of county commissioners of each county shall cause a map to be prepared showing each road in the county primary and secondary system and designating each primary road by appropriate number, and said board shall cause notice of intention to adopt said map as the official map of such system to be given, which notice shall specify the time and place at which all interested persons will be heard. Such notice of intention shall be published once a week for at least two successive weeks preceding the date of such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county.

After such hearing, the board of county commissioners shall adopt such map, with any changes or revisions deemed by it to be advisable, as the official map of the road system of the county.

(1.5) The board of county commissioners of any county with a population of two hundred fifty thousand or more may designate as a primary road any four-lane controlled-access county highway, the construction of which commences in 2016, that is located within the unincorporated area of the county and that intersects with an interstate highway or a United States numbered highway. If a city or an incorporated town subsequently annexes any portion of a highway that has been designated as a primary road, the respective jurisdiction, control, and duty of the county and of the city or incorporated town with respect to the highway is as follows:

The city or incorporated town shall exercise full responsibility for and control over the highway beyond and including the curbs and, if no curb is installed, beyond the traveled way, its contiguous shoulders, and appurtenances.

The county has the authority to grant or deny access to the highway and to roughed-in roads, as defined in section 42-1-102 (85.5), and to establish weight restrictions for vehicles traveling on the highway as authorized by section 42-4-106 (1), (2), and (3)(b).

The county has the authority to prohibit the suspension of signs, banners, or decorations above the portion of the highway between the curbs or, if the highway does not have curbs, between the portion of the highway used for vehicular travel up to a vertical height of twenty feet above the surface of the highway.

The city or incorporated town shall maintain all of its underground facilities under the highway at its own expense and has the right to construct such underground facilities as may be necessary under the highway.

The city or incorporated town has the right to grant the privilege to open the surface of the highway, but all resulting damages shall promptly be repaired either by the city or incorporated town itself or at its direction.

The city or incorporated town shall provide street illumination at its own expense and shall clean the highway, including storm sewer inlets and catch basins.

The county has the right to utilize all storm sewers on the highway without cost; and if new storm sewer facilities are necessary in construction of the highway by the county, the county and the municipality shall bear the cost of the facilities as mutually agreed upon by the board of county commissioners of the county and the local governing body of the city or incorporated town.

The city or incorporated town shall regulate and enforce all traffic and parking restrictions on the portion of the highway that is located within the city or incorporated town.

The county shall erect, control, and maintain at county expense all route markers and directional signs, except street signs, on the portion of the highway located within the city or incorporated town.

The county shall install, operate, maintain, and control at county expense all traffic control signals, signs, and traffic control devices on the portion of the highway located within the city or incorporated town. No local authority shall erect or maintain any stop sign or traffic control signal at any location that requires the traffic on the highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway unless the local authority first obtains approval in writing from the county. For the purposes of this paragraph (j), "traffic control device" includes, but is not limited to, striping, lane-marking, and channelization.

Either the city or incorporated town or the county shall acquire rights-of-way for the highway as mutually agreed upon. Costs of acquiring the rights-of-way may be the sole expense of the county or the city or incorporated town, or shared by both, as mutually agreed upon. Title to all rights-of-way acquired vest in the city or incorporated town, or in the county, according to the agreement under which the rights-of-way were secured.

The county is authorized to acquire rights-of-way for the highway by purchase, gift, or condemnation. Any condemnation proceeding shall be conducted in the manner provided by law for condemnation proceedings to acquire lands required for county highways. Nothing in this subsection (1.5) abrogates the right of a home rule city to acquire lands for purposes and in the manner set forth in the charter of the city.

The county may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with a city or incorporated town located within the county to add to the highway specified roads or streets annexed by the city or incorporated town before the designation of the highway as a primary road. Such an agreement must define the respective jurisdiction, control, and duty of the county and the city or incorporated town with respect to the highway and may modify the division of such jurisdiction, control, and duty from the division specified in paragraphs (a) to (l) of this subsection (1.5).

All roads not on the county primary system and for which the boards of county commissioners assume responsibility shall be the county secondary system.

Nothing in this section shall limit the power of any board of county commissioners to subsequently include or exclude any road from the county primary system in the same manner provided for the selection of the initial road system as provided in this section. Where a portion of a state highway is abandoned and it appears that such abandoned portion is necessary for use as a public highway, then such abandoned portion shall become a part of the county system upon the adoption of a resolution to that effect by the board of county commissioners of the county wherein such abandoned portion is located within ninety days after such abandonment.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 514, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-10.

L. 2016:

(1.5) added, (HB 16-1155), ch. 134, p. 386, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(1.5)(b) amended, (SB 21-084), ch. 50, p. 214, § 3, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For publication of legal notices, see article 70 of title 24.

43-2-111. Road supervisors - districts - duties - powers.

The county systems, both primary and secondary roads, shall be assigned to the county for construction and maintenance. The board of county commissioners of each county shall, except in counties where the boundaries thereof coincide with the boundaries of a city, prior to January 1, 1954, appoint road supervisors for all roads constituting the county system. Said supervisors shall be competent to handle the road and highway work of the county and shall be approved by the board of county commissioners. Nothing in this section shall preclude one such person from serving two or more counties. The county surveyor may be appointed, if found by the board of county commissioners to be properly qualified, or a county commissioner may act as such supervisor. The board of county commissioners shall determine the general policies of the county as to county highway matters, and the same shall be carried out and administered by the county road supervisors.

Each county shall furnish evidence to the transportation commission that it has complied with the provisions of this section.

The board of county commissioners of the respective counties of the state may divide their counties into such suitable road districts as, in their judgment, will best subserve the interest of the people of the whole county.

The board of county commissioners of the respective counties, by mutual agreement, may form road districts consisting of more than one county. Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny any county the right to expend any funds for county road purposes outside the limits of said county if the interests of the people of the county will be subserved thereby. In all cases where road districts from more than one county are consolidated, the road supervisor shall be appointed by mutual agreement of the boards of county commissioners of the counties so forming a road district subject to the same provisions and limitations as provided for road supervisors of single counties. Road supervisors so appointed by a county or group of counties shall receive a salary to be determined by the board of county commissioners in the respective county or, in cases of two or more counties combining to appoint a single supervisor, by agreement between the boards of county commissioners of the counties so combining. He shall hold office during satisfactory service, but he may be removed by any board of county commissioners at any time at the discretion of said board, and a successor appointed.

A road supervisor's duties shall be to take charge of and be responsible for all road personnel, road machinery, and tools owned by the county and to inspect all roads and bridges within the county and locate proper road material. He shall make such recommendations for road repair and for construction of roads as in his judgment may be required. He shall, on the first day of each month, make written recommendations for road and bridge work together with an estimate of the cost, which shall be subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners. He shall, on or before the first Monday of each month, render a full and complete account of all expenditures and contracts for the month preceding. The type of report shall be prepared in conformity with rules established by the board of county commissioners. At least once each year the department of transportation shall hold a meeting for the express purpose of exchanging information with representatives of the counties relating to highway construction and maintenance.

He has the power now lodged with the board of county commissioners by general enactment for the prevention of damages to public highways from ditch overflows, insufficient or unsafe conduits, flumes, or ditches crossing the public highways, the removal or disposition of any material injurious to the public highway, unsafe railroad or tramway crossings, or any other cause which may arise and which comes under the jurisdiction of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 515, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-11.

L. 91:

(2) and (5) amended, p. 1100, § 134, effective July 1.

43-2-112. Condemnation for county roads.

The board of county commissioners on its own initiative may lay out, widen, alter, or change any county road, and the board of county commissioners shall cause the county road supervisor of the respective county to survey the proposed road and make a written report to the board of county commissioners of the county, describing the proposed road to be laid out, opened, or changed, as the case may be, and the portions of land of each landowner to be taken for that purpose, said report to be accompanied by a map showing the present and proposed boundaries of the portion of the county road to be established, opened, or changed, together with an estimate of the damages and benefits accruing to each landowner whose land may be affected thereby. If, upon receipt of such report, the board of county commissioners decides that public interest or convenience will be subserved by the proposed change, said board shall certify such proposal to the transportation commission and cause a plat to be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder in a book kept for that purpose.

The board of county commissioners shall tender to each landowner the amount of damages as estimated and approved by the board, and the board may designate any person to act as its agent in making such tender. In estimating the amount of damages to be tendered, due account shall be taken of any benefits which will accrue to the landowner by the proposed action; but the amount of benefit shall not in any case exceed the amount of damages awarded. Any person owning land or having interest in land over which any proposed county road extends, who is of the opinion that such tender is inadequate, may personally, or by agent or attorney, on or before ten days from the date of such tender, file a written request addressed to the board of county commissioners of said county for a jury to ascertain the compensation which he may be entitled to by reason of damages sustained therefrom. Thereupon, the board of county commissioners shall proceed in the acquisition of such premises under articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S. The board of county commissioners also has the power and is authorized to proceed in the acquisition of lands of private persons for county roads, under and according to articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., in the first instance without tender or other proceedings under this part 1.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 516, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-12.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1100, § 135, effective July 1.

43-2-113. Abandoned county primary roads.

When a portion of the county primary system is relocated and because of such relocation a portion of the route as it existed before such relocation is, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners, no longer necessary as part of the county road system, such portion shall be considered as abandoned, and title to it shall revert to the owner of the land through which such abandoned portion may lie subject to the provisions of part 3 of this article. If it appears that such abandoned portion is necessary for use as a secondary road, then such abandoned portion shall become a secondary road, upon the adoption by the board of county commissioners of a resolution to that effect. If it appears to the board that any landowner suffers damages because of the abandonment of any portion of a county primary road, such damages shall be determined, tendered, and paid in the same manner as other damages referred to in this part 1.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 517, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-13.

43-2-114. Standards for county primary roads.

After December 31, 1953, roads constructed by the respective counties as part of the primary road system shall be constructed to general standards acceptable for county primary roads, where found practicable by the board of county commissioners. Such general standards shall conform to those adopted by the transportation commission for the state highway system for the corresponding class of road in the state highway system.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 518, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-14.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1101, § 136, effective July 1.

43-2-115. Allocations - reports - grace period.

The state treasurer or any other state officer so designated shall make complete allocations from highway user revenues to only those counties which have complied with all the requirements of this part 1. The state agency or department designated in this part 1 to receive county reports shall inform the counties in writing, by certified mail, of any delinquencies in reporting and shall forward a copy of such notice to the state treasurer. Delinquent counties shall be allowed a grace period of sixty days after date of notice in which to rectify the delinquency. If the required reports have not been received at the end of the sixty-day grace period, the state treasurer shall withhold the moneys due to such counties until he has been informed that the required reports have been received. Payments withheld will be paid to the counties upon receipt of the delinquent reports.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 518, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-15.

L. 71:

p. 1138, § 3.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1935, § 1, effective July 1.

43-2-116. Federal aid - matching funds.

In the event that any fund becomes available from the federal government for expenditure in conjunction with county funds, for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any roads in any county, the board of county commissioners of the respective counties, upon approval by the department of transportation, may use such funds which have accrued to their respective counties from the highway users tax fund for the purpose of matching the federal funds becoming available if the board of county commissioners of any such county has, by proper resolution filed in duplicate with the department of transportation and approved by said department, determined the road construction, alteration, repair, or improvement to be performed in such county and the same is found to conform in all respects to the requirements necessary for the use of such funds of the federal government and if all such funds so available for matching purposes are expended only as provided by law. Any county using highway users tax funds for the purpose of matching federal funds shall be required to reimburse the department of transportation for engineering services rendered by said department in connection with the expenditure of federal funds.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 518, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-16.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1101, § 137, effective July 1.

43-2-117. County line roads - apportionment.

If any proposed county road is on the county line between two counties, the board of county commissioners of each county interested shall proceed in the same manner provided in section 43-2-112, and the board of county commissioners of each interested county by mutual agreement shall designate the county road supervisor who shall survey the proposed road and make the report to said boards in the same manner as provided in section 43-2-112; and the concurrence of the boards of county commissioners of both counties shall be necessary to establish it. If any such road is established, each of such counties shall open and maintain a definite part thereof, which the board of county commissioners of such counties shall apportion by mutual agreement between the two counties or by application of subsection (4) of section 43-2-111, and if the boards of county commissioners cannot agree upon the apportionment, it may refer the matter to three disinterested freeholders as arbitrators, whose duty it shall be to apportion same and report thereon to the boards of county commissioners of both counties.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 519, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-17.

43-2-118. Private roads.

The manner of laying out any private road from the land of any person so as to connect with any public road and of condemning the lands necessary therefor shall be the same as provided in this part 1; except that the petition in such cases need be signed by only such person and the damages which may accrue and the expense of opening such road shall be paid by such petitioner.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 519, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-18.

43-2-119. County road budgets.

The board of county commissioners shall each year prepare a preliminary or tentative road budget for the county in compliance with the local government budget law. The county road budget shall show in detail anticipated revenues from all sources and proposed expenditures for all purposes. The budget shall be compiled so that it will show, separately, the anticipated revenues and expenditures for the county road system.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 519, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-19.

Cross references:

For the local government budget law, see part 1 of article 1 of title 29.

43-2-120. Annual county reports.

On or before the thirtieth day of June of each year, the board of county commissioners of each county shall cause to be made and filed with the highway maintenance division a complete report of the expenditures of all moneys applied to county road systems during the calendar year ending on the thirty-first day of December next preceding. The division shall prescribe the form and contents of the report.

The report must contain the following:

A detailed statement identifying the separate amounts and sources of all moneys available during the calendar year covered by the report, including moneys made available by the United States government, the state, and any other governmental agency and moneys available from bond issues, special assessments, tax levy, or any other source whatever for expenditure for street and road purposes;

A detailed statement of all expenditures during the calendar year covered by the report for street and road purposes, including obligations incurred but not yet paid. The statement must contain uniform categories prescribed by the highway maintenance division, including, but not be limited to, expenditures for rights-of-way or other property, construction, maintenance, acquisition of equipment, and administration. The statement must also set forth the amount of funds on hand at the beginning of the calendar year covered by the report and any unexpended funds remaining at the close of the calendar year. The division shall prescribe such other expenditure categories and such other information as may be deemed necessary by the division to fully disclose the nature and extent of all transactions by any county relating to streets and roads.

The highway maintenance division shall prepare detailed instructions for the uniform reporting of receipts and expenditures of all moneys applied to county streets and roads.

The highway maintenance division shall annually tabulate and compile all such reports and statements received from the counties and shall publish these data in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

On or before March 1 of each year, the board of county commissioners of each county shall submit to the department of transportation a map which indicates any changes in the mileage or location of any road within the county system of roads, together with any changes in the surface classification of any roads within the county system which have been made during the calendar year ending on December 31 next preceding.

Information concerning the condition of the streets, roads, and highways submitted pursuant to section 43-1-115 (2), shall be reported in conjunction with the report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

Source:

L. 53:

p. 519, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-20.

L. 54:

p. 153, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-20.

L. 64:

p. 169, § 130.

L. 67:

p. 919, § 1.

L. 71:

pp. 1138, 1142, §§ 4, 1.

L. 72:

p. 617, § 149.

L. 77:

(5) amended, p. 1935, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(4) amended, p. 845, § 82, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(5) amended, p. 1209, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 91:

(1), (2)(b), and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1101, § 138, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1098, § 16, effective June 1.

L. 2015:

(1), IP(2), (2)(b), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 177, § 9, effective March 30.

43-2-121. Annual state report.

At the same time that the highway maintenance division tabulates the reports and statements from the various counties, the division shall also prepare a statement setting forth the amount expended by the division during the preceding calendar year in the same manner as required of counties. Publication of the data shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 520, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 120-13-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-13-21.

L. 64:

p. 169, § 131.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 845, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1102, § 139, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 177, § 10, effective March 30.